Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 20 Condominium Ownership

Law reviews. —

See comment, “Secured Transactions and the Wyoming Condominium Ownership Act,” V Land & Water L. Rev. 481 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

15A Am. Jur. 2d Condominiums and Co-operative Apartments §§ 1-61.

Erection of condominiums as violation of restrictive covenant forbidding erection of apartment houses, 65 ALR3d 1212.

Zoning or building regulations as applied to condominiums, 71 ALR3d 866.

Real estate taxation of condominiums, 71 ALR3d 952.

Expenses for which condominium association may assess unit owners, 77 ALR3d 1290.

Enforceability of bylaw or other rule of condominium or co-operative association restricting occupancy by children, 100 ALR3d 241.

Construction of contractual or state regulatory provisions respecting formation, composition, and powers of governing body of condominium association, 13 ALR4th 598.

Validity, construction and application of statutes, or of condominium association's bylaws or regulations, restricting sale, transfer or lease of condominium units, 17 ALR4th 1247.

Validity and construction of law regulating conversion of rental housing to condominiums, 21 ALR4th 1083.

Right of condominium association's management or governing body to inspect individual units, 41 ALR4th 730.

Condominium association's liability to unit owner for injuries caused by third person's criminal conduct, 59 ALR4th 489.

Standing to bring action relating to title in real property of condominium, 74 ALR4th 165.

Standing to bring action relating to real property of condominium, 74 ALR4th 165.

Validity and construction of condominium bylaws or regulations placing special regulations, burdens or restrictions on nonresident unit owners, 76 ALR4th 295.

Validity and construction of regulations of governing body of condominium or cooperative apartment pertaining to parking, 60 ALR5th 647.

§ 34-20-101.
Short title.

This act [§§

34-20-101

through

34-20-104

] shall be known and may be cited as the “Condominium Ownership Act”.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.7.

§ 34-20-102.
Condominium ownership recognized; fee simple estate in air space and common elements; inseparability.

Condominium ownership of real property is recognized in this state. Whether created before or after the date of this chapter, such ownership shall be deemed to consist of a separate fee simple estate in an individual air space unit of a multi-unit property together with an undivided fee simple interest in common elements. The separate estate of any condominium owner of an individual air space unit and his common ownership of such common elements as are appurtenant to his individual air space unit by the terms of the recorded declaration shall be inseparable for any period of condominium ownership that is prescribed by the said recorded declaration.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 59, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.8; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “chapter” for “article” in the second sentence.

Laws 2010, ch. 82 § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1965, ch. 59, carried no provision as to its effective date, but was enacted at a session that adjourned on February 20, 1965.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of statutes, or of condominium association's bylaws or regulations, restricting number of units that may be owned by single individual or entity, 39 ALR4th 88.

Personal liability of owner of condominium unit to one sustaining personal injuries or property damage by condition of common areas, 39 ALR4th 98.

§ 34-20-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

34-20-101

through

34-20-104

], unless the context otherwise requires:

An “individual air space unit” shall consist of any enclosed room or rooms occupying all or part of a floor or floors in a building of one (1) or more floors to be used for residential, professional, commercial or industrial purposes and which has access to a public street;

Unless otherwise provided in the declaration or by written consent of all the condominium owners:

“General common elements” means the land on which a building or buildings are located; the foundations, columns, girders, beams, supports, main walls, roofs, halls, corridors, lobbies, stairs, stairways, fire escapes, entrances and exits of such building or buildings; the basements, yards, gardens, parking areas and storage spaces; the premises for the lodging of custodians or persons in charge of the property; installations of central services such as power, light, gas, hot and cold water, heating, refrigeration, central air conditioning and incinerating; the elevators, tanks, pumps, motors, fans, compressors, ducts and in general all apparatus and installations existing for common use; such community and commercial facilities as may be provided for in the declaration; and all other parts of the property necessary or convenient to its existence, maintenance and safety, or normally in common use;

“Limited common elements” means those common elements designated in the declaration as reserved for use by fewer than all the owners of the individual air space units;

“Condominium unit” means an individual air space unit together with the interest in the common elements appurtenant to such unit;

“Declaration” is an instrument which defines the character, duration, rights, obligations and limitations of condominium ownership.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 59, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.9.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-20-104.
Notice to tax assessor; apportionment of taxes; recording declaration; covenants running with land.

Whenever condominium ownership of real property is created, or separate assessment of condominium units is desired, a written notice thereof shall be delivered to the assessor of the county in which said real property is situated, which notice shall set forth descriptions of the condominium units. Thereafter all taxes, assessments and other charges of this state or of any political subdivision or of any special improvement district or any other taxing or assessing authority shall be assessed against and collected on each condominium unit, each of which shall be carried on the tax books as a separate and distinct parcel for the purpose, and not on the building or property as a whole. The valuation of the general and limited common elements shall be assessed proportionately upon the individual air space unit in the manner provided in the declaration. The lien for taxes assessed to any individual condominium owner shall be confined to his condominium unit and to his undivided interest in the general and limited common elements. No forfeiture or sale of any condominium unit for delinquent taxes, mechanics, laborers or materialmen’s liens, assessments or charges shall divest or in any way affect the title of other condominium units.

The declaration shall be recorded in the office of the county clerk where the condominium property is located. Such declaration shall provide for the filing for record of a map properly locating condominium units. Any instrument affecting the condominium unit may legally describe it by the identifying condominium unit number or symbol as shown on such map. If such declaration provides for the disposition of condominium units in the event of the destruction or obsolescence of buildings in which such units are situated and restricts partition of the common elements, the rules or laws known as the rule against perpetuities and the rule prohibiting unlawful restraints on alienation shall not be applied to defeat or limit any such provisions.

To the extent that any such declaration shall contain a mandatory requirement that all condominium unit owners shall be members of an association or corporation, or provide for the payment of charges assessed by the association upon condominium units, or the appointment of an attorney-in-fact to deal with the property upon its destruction or obsolescence, any rule of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the same shall be considered as covenants running with the land binding upon all condominium owners and their successors in interest. Any common law rule terminating agency upon death or disability of a principal shall not be applied to defeat or limit any such provisions.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 59, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 34-389.10.

Cross references. —

As to letters of attorney generally, see §

34-1-103

et seq.

As to durable powers of attorney, see §§

3-5-101

to

3-5-103

.

As to county assessors, see §§

18-3-201

to

18-3-204

.

As to mechanic's liens generally, see §§

29-2-101

to 29-2-111.

Cited

in

Merrill v. Jansma, 2004 WY 26, 86 P.3d 270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of owner of unit in condominium, recreational development, time-share property or the like, for assessment in support of common facilities levied against and unpaid by prior owner, 39 ALR4th 114.

Validity and enforceability of condominium owner's covenant to pay dues or fees to sports or recreational facility, 39 ALR4th 129.